Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER 50

CHARTER
COMMISSIONS

Section

50-1 Applicability

50-2 Definitions

50-3 Charter commissions

50-4 Qualifications of commission members

50-5 Commission organization and procedures

50-6 Duties and functions of commissions

50-7 Powers of the commission

50-8 Submission of proposed charter to
legislative body of

the county

50-9 Submission of proposed charter to county
clerk

50-10 Publication and submission to electors

50-11 Charter amendment and revision

50-12 Tenure of commission

50-13 Compensation of commission members

50-14 Appropriations and disbursements

50-15 Reserved powers

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next